Hawaii statutes.
§656-2 Consideration need not be in
writing. The consideration of any such promise, contract, or agreement,
need not be set forth, or expressed, in the writing signed by the party to be
charged therewith, but may be proved by any other legal evidence. [CC 1859,
§1054; RL 1925, §2666; RL 1935, §3901; RL 1945, §8722; RL 1955, §190-2; HRS
§656-2]

Case Notes

Concerning a guarantor. 4 H. 47 (1877). Cf. 31 H. 34
(1929).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next